California statutes. Education Code
(d) If the total estimated actual expenditures and the total actual quality improvements described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (c) are less than the total budgeted expenditures and the total planned quality improvements described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (c), and together these efforts are less than the total increase or improvement in services required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), all of the following requirements shall apply:

(1) The difference shall be expressed as an unused portion of the increase in funds apportioned on the basis of the number and concentration of unduplicated pupils in the school district, county office of education, or charter school set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(2) The funds herein shall be expended only to implement specific actions that satisfy the requirements for specific actions to be considered as contributing toward meeting the increased or improved services requirement pursuant to the regulations adopted by the state board pursuant to subdivision (a).

(3) The local educational
 agency shall report the planned uses of the funds in its local control and accountability plan pursuant to Section 52064.

(e) The requirements in subdivision (d) are independent and additional to the requirement to increase or improve services for the ensuing fiscal year established in regulations adopted by the state board pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 44, Sec. 29.   (AB 130)   Effective July 9, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

42238.1.

(a) For the 1986–87 fiscal year and each fiscal year up to and including the 1998–99 fiscal year, the Superintendent shall compute an inflation adjustment equal to the product of paragraphs (1) and (2):

(1) Compute the sum of the following:

(A) The statewide average base revenue limit per unit of average daily attendance for the prior fiscal year for school districts of similar type.

(B) The amount, if any, per unit of average daily attendance received by the school district pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 46200) of Chapter 2 of Part 26 for the prior fiscal year.

(2) The percentage change in the annual average value of the Implicit Price Deflator for State and Local Government Purchases of Goods and Services for the United States, as published by the United States Department of Commerce for the 12-month period ending in the third quarter of the prior fiscal year. This percentage change shall be determined using the latest data available as of May 1 of the preceding fiscal year compared with the annual average value of the same deflator for the 12-month period ending in the third quarter of the second preceding fiscal year, using the latest data available as of May 1 of the second preceding fiscal year, as reported by the Department of Finance.

(b) For the 1999–2000 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the Superintendent shall compute an inflation adjustment equal to the product of paragraphs (1) and (2):

(1) Compute the sum of the following:

(A) The statewide average base revenue limit per unit of average daily attendance for the prior fiscal year for school districts of similar type.

(B) The amount, if any, per unit of average daily attendance received by the school district pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 46200) of Chapter 2 of Part 26 for the prior fiscal year.

(2) The percentage change in the annual average value of the Implicit Price Deflator for State and Local Government Purchases of Goods and Services for the United States, as published by the United States Department of Commerce for the 12-month period ending in the third quarter of the prior fiscal year. This percentage change shall be determined using the latest data available as of May 10 of the preceding fiscal year compared with the annual average value of the same deflator for the 12-month period ending in the third quarter of the second preceding fiscal year, using the latest data available as of May 10 of the preceding fiscal year, as report by the Department of Finance.

(c) This section shall become operative July 1, 1986.

(d) Commencing with the 2013–14 fiscal year, this section shall be used only for purposes of allocating revenues received pursuant to
 subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 36 of Article XIII of the California Constitution.

(e) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2033, and, as of January 1, 2034, is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that becomes operative on or before January 1, 2034, deletes or extends the dates on which it becomes inoperative and is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 32, Sec. 35.   (AB 1808)   Effective June 27, 2018.   Inoperative July 1, 2033.    Repealed as of January 1, 2034, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

42238.2.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding Section 42238.5 or any other law, a school district that meets any of the following conditions shall be entitled to an adjustment to its units of average daily attendance pursuant to this section:

(A) The school district experiences a decline in the number of units of average daily attendance in excess of 8 percent of its total average daily attendance as a result of the closure of a facility operated by a branch of the United States Armed Forces in the school district’s boundaries.

(B) The school district experiences a decline in the number of units of average daily attendance that is less than 8 percent but at least 5 percent of its total average daily attendance as a result of the closure of a facility operated by a branch of the United States Armed Forces in that school district’s boundaries, upon a finding by both the Superintendent and the Director of Finance that both of the following conditions exist:

(i) The school district demonstrates that at the end of a three-year period the school district will experience a 10-percent reduction in the amount of funding that the school district would otherwise have received from state apportionments, funding received pursuant to the California State Lottery Act of 1984 (Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 8880) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code), and funding received pursuant to federal Title VIII of Public Law 103-382, as a result of the loss of pupils related to the closure of a facility operated by a branch of the United States Armed Forces.

(ii) The fiscal crisis and
 management assistance team established pursuant to Section 42127.8 has reviewed the school district’s finances and has found that the school district has taken significant steps to reduce expenditure.

(C) The school district experiences a decline in the number of units of average daily attendance in excess of 5 percent of its total average daily attendance and the Director of Finance determines that the school district is likely, within eight years of that decline, to maintain a number of units of average daily attendance that is equivalent to the number of units of average daily attendance maintained by the school district before the decline. Notwithstanding subdivision (b), loan repayments shall commence no later than the fourth year after the base year or at a later time, as determined by the Director of Finance.

(2) For purposes of this section, the year preceding a decline shall be the base year.

(b) In the second year after the base year, the district average daily attendance pursuant to Section 42238.5 may, if the school district chooses, be increased by 75 percent of the difference between the base year units of average daily attendance and the units of average daily attendance in the first year of decline. In the
 third year after the base year, the school district average daily attendance pursuant to Section 42238.5 may, if the school district chooses, be increased by 50 percent of the difference between the base year units of average daily attendance and the units of average daily attendance in the first year of decline. The amount of money represented by these increases shall be considered a loan to the school district. Loan repayments shall commence no later than the fourth year after the base year.

(c) (1) The Superintendent, in consultation with a school district subject to this section, shall determine a schedule for repayment of the total amount loaned pursuant to this section that may not exceed 10 years. Payments shall include interest charged at a rate based on the most current investment rate of the Pooled Money Investment Account in the General Fund as of the date of the disbursement of funds to the school district.

(2) Upon written notification by the Superintendent that the school district has not made one or more of the payments required by the schedule established pursuant to paragraph (1), the Controller shall withhold from Section A of the State School Fund the defaulted payment that shall not exceed the amount of any apportionment entitlement of the school district to moneys in Section A of the State School Fund. In that regard, the Controller shall withhold the amount of any payment made under this subdivision, including reimbursement of the Controller’s administrative costs as determined under a schedule approved by the California Debt Advisory Commission, from subsequent apportionments to the school district from Section A of the State School Fund.

(3) Any apportionments made by the Controller pursuant to paragraph (2) shall be deemed to be an allocation to the school district for purposes of subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the
 California Constitution, and for purposes of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 41200) of Part 24.

(d) In no event shall the adjustment provided by this section cause the apportionment to a school district to exceed the amount that would otherwise be calculated for apportionment to the school district pursuant to Sections 42238 and 42238.1.

(e) This section does not apply to a school district that experiences a decline in enrollment as a result of a school district reorganization pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 35500) of Part 21 or any other law.

(f) Commencing with the 2013–14 fiscal year, this section shall be used only for purposes of allocating revenues received pursuant to subparagraph (B)
 of paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 36 of Article XIII of the California Constitution.

(g) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2033, and, as of January 1, 2034, is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that becomes operative on or before January 1, 2034, deletes or extends the dates on which it becomes inoperative and is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 32, Sec. 36.   (AB 1808)   Effective June 27, 2018.   Inoperative July 1, 2033.    Repealed as of January 1, 2034, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

42238.3.

(a) For each year during the loan repayment period provided for in Section 42238.2, any district utilizing the adjustment pursuant to Section 42238.2 may adjust its revenue limit computed pursuant to Section 42238 to the statewide average revenue limit per unit of average daily attendance for its size and type of district in proportion to the percentage of the loan that the school district has repaid up to and including the year in which the revenue limit adjustment is made.

(b) This section does not apply to a school district that experiences a decline in enrollment as a result of a school district reorganization pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 35500) of Part 21 or any other law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 404, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

42238.5.

(a) For purposes of Section 42238, the fiscal year average daily attendance shall be computed pursuant to paragraph (1) or (2).

(1) The second principal apportionment regular average daily attendance for either the current or prior fiscal year, whichever is greater. However, prior fiscal year average daily attendance shall be adjusted for any loss or gain of average daily attendance due to a reorganization or transfer of territory.

(2) Any school district that elects to receive funding pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 42280) shall compute its units of average daily attendance for purposes of Section 42238 by subtracting the amount determined in subparagraph (B) from the amount
 determined in subparagraph (A).

(A) The units of average daily attendance computed pursuant to paragraph (1).

(B) The units of average daily attendance resulting from pupils attending schools funded pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 42280).

(b) For purposes of this article, regular average daily attendance shall be the base revenue limit average daily attendance, excluding summer school average daily attendance.

(c) For purposes of this section, for the 1998–99 fiscal year only, the prior year average daily attendance shall be the 1997–98 regular average daily attendance, excluding absences excused pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 46010, as that subdivision read on July 1, 1996.

(d) Commencing with the 2013–14 fiscal year, this section shall be used only for purposes of allocating revenues received pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 36 of Article XIII of the California Constitution.

(e) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2033, and, as of January 1, 2034, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 32.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Inoperative July 1, 2033, by its own provisions.    Repealed as of January 1, 2034, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

42238.51.

(a) For purposes of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 42238.5, a sponsoring school district’s average daily attendance shall be computed as follows:

(1) Compute the sponsoring school district’s regular average daily attendance in the current year, excluding the attendance of pupils in charter schools.

(2) (A) Compute the regular average daily attendance used to calculate the second
 principal apportionment of the school district for the prior year, excluding the attendance of pupils in charter schools.

(B) Compute the attendance of pupils who attended one or more noncharter schools of the school district between July 1, and the last day of the second period, inclusive, in the prior year, and who attended a charter school sponsored by the school district between July 1, and the last day of the second period, inclusive, in the current year. For the purposes of this paragraph, a pupil enrolled in a grade at a charter school sponsored by the school district shall not be counted if the school district does not offer classes for pupils enrolled in that grade. The amount of the attendance counted for any pupil for the purpose of this subparagraph may not be greater than the attendance claimed for that pupil by the charter school in the current year.

(C) Compute the
 attendance of pupils who attended a charter school sponsored by the school district in the prior year and who attended one or more noncharter schools of the school district in the current year. The amount of the attendance counted for any pupil for the purpose of this subparagraph may not be greater than the attendance claimed for that pupil by the school district in the current year.

(D) From the amount determined pursuant to subparagraph (B), subtract the amount determined pursuant to subparagraph (C). If the result is less than zero, the amount shall be deemed to be zero.

(E) The prior year average daily attendance determined pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall be reduced by the amount determined pursuant to subparagraph (D).

(3) To the greater of the amounts computed pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2), add the
 regular average daily attendance in the current year of all pupils attending charter schools sponsored by the district that are not funded pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 47633) of Chapter 6 of Part 26.

(b) For the purposes of this section, a “sponsoring school district” shall mean a “sponsoring local educational agency,” as defined in Section 47632.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2007.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 653, Sec. 2) by Stats. 2007, Ch. 130, Sec. 68.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

42238.52.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the prior year average daily attendance for a school district determined pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 42238.51 shall be increased by the prior year second principal apportionment average daily attendance of district residents only of any school that meets the following description:

(1) The school was a district noncharter school in any year prior to the prior year.

(2) The school was operated as a district-approved charter school in the prior year.

(3) The school is again operated as a district noncharter school in the current year.

(b) An adjustment to prior year average daily attendance pursuant to this section may not be made for the attendance of pupils who were not residents of the school district in the prior year.

(c) This section applies to the 2000–01 fiscal year and subsequent fiscal years.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 47661.5 by Stats. 2002, Ch. 930, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

42238.6.

(a) The fiscal year average daily attendance computed under Section 42238.5 shall be increased, for each school district that operates any school that meets the eligibility requirements set forth in subdivision (b), by the number of child days of attendance of pupils enrolled in eligible schools in the district who are currently migratory children, as defined by Section 54441, and who are residing in state-operated migrant housing projects between the second principal apportionment and the end of the regular school year, divided by the number of days school was actually taught in the regular day schools of the district, excluding
 Saturdays and Sundays.

(b) For a school to be eligible for the purposes of this section, the following conditions shall apply:

(1) One or more state-operated migrant housing projects are located within the attendance area of the school.

(2) The maximum number of pupils enrolled in the school in the relevant fiscal year who are currently migratory children, as calculated under subdivision (a), constitutes not less than one-third of the total pupil enrollment of the school.

(c) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall establish rules and regulations for the implementation of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 845, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

42238.75.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law:

(a) All completed audits, including those on appeal, of school districts, charter schools, and county offices of education funded by Item 8860-025-0001 of Section 2.00 of Chapter 50 of the Statutes of 1999, Item 8860-025-0001 of Section 2.00 of Chapter 52 of the Statutes of 2000, and Item 8860-025-0001 of Section 2.00 of Chapter 106 of the Statutes of 2001, and any findings of those audits, are withdrawn, and no loss of apportionment arising from the
 findings of those audits shall be realized.

(b) All audits funded by Item 8860-025-0001 of Section 2.00 of Chapter 50 of the Statutes of 1999, Item 8860-025-0001 of Section 2.00 of Chapter 52 of the Statutes of 2000, and Item 8860-025-0001 of Section 2.00 of Chapter 106 of the Statutes of 2001, shall be discontinued.

(c) The Controller shall notify all school districts, charter schools, and county offices of education that it is no longer necessary to retain records supporting pupil attendance and excused absences used for purposes of calculating average daily attendance during the 1996–97 fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1128, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

42238.15.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, and in lieu of any inflation or cost-of-living adjustment otherwise authorized for the programs enumerated in subdivision (b), state funding for the programs enumerated in subdivision (b) shall be increased annually by the product of the following:

(1) The sum of 1.0 plus the percentage change determined under paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 42238.02.

(2) The sum of 1.0 plus the percentage of increase, from the prior fiscal year to the current fiscal year, in each of the workload factors described in subdivision (b) or, for paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), zero, whichever is greater.

(b) The programs for which annual state funding increases are determined under this section, and the factors used to measure workload for each of those programs, are as follows:

(1) Special education programs and services, with workload measured by the regular second principal apportionment average daily attendance for kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive.

(2) Childcare and development programs, and preschool programs, with workload measured by the state population of children up to and including four years of age.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, childcare and development programs shall not receive a cost-of-living adjustment in the 2012–13, 2013–14, 2014–15, 2020–21, and 2025–26 fiscal years.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law, childcare and development programs shall not receive a cost-of-living adjustment in the 2023–24 and 2024–25 fiscal years, except for resource and referral agencies pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 10217) of, and local childcare and development planning councils pursuant to Chapter 31 (commencing with Section 10480) of, Part 1.8 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 13, Sec. 3.   (SB 120)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

42238.18.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, only those pupils enrolled in county office of education programs while detained in a juvenile hall, juvenile home, day center, juvenile ranch, juvenile camp, or regional youth educational facility established pursuant to Article 23 (commencing with Section 850), Article 24 (commencing with Section 880), and Article 24.5 (commencing with Section 894) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code shall be counted as juvenile court school pupils. For purposes of apportionments, those pupils in a group home housing 25 or more children placed pursuant to Sections 362, 727, and 730 of the Welfare and Institutions Code or in any group home housing 25 or more children and operating one or
 more additional sites under a central administration for children placed pursuant to Section 362, 727, or 730 of the Welfare and Institutions Code shall be reported as county group home and institutions pupils to the Superintendent and shall be counted as juvenile court school pupils for purposes of apportionments.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, pupils who are referred by the county probation department under Section 601 or 654 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, shall be enrolled and eligible for apportionments in county community schools only after an individualized review and certification of the appropriateness of enrollment in the county group home and institution’s school or county community school. The individualized review shall include representatives of the court, the county office of education, the county probation department, and either the school district of residence or, in cases in which the pupil resides in a group home or
 institution, the school district in which the group home or institution is located, and, in each case, the school district representative shall agree to the appropriateness of the proposed placement and pupils so placed shall have a probation officer assigned to their case.

(c) Regardless of the operative date of the amendments to this section made during the 1997 portion of the 1997–98 Regular Session, this section, as so amended, shall be implemented as though it had been operative on July 1, 1996. For the purpose of implementing this section for the entire 1996–97 fiscal year, the Superintendent and other public officers shall take all necessary steps to effect the required adjustments and shall have authority to adjust allowance computations, apportionments, and disbursements ordered from Section A of the State School Fund and other public funds.

(d) Notwithstanding any other
 law, on or after July 1, 2013, a county office of education may expend funds previously deposited in the capital outlay reserve established pursuant to former paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of this section, as this section read on June 30, 2013, for any of the purposes specified in the local control and accountability plan adopted pursuant to Section 52066.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 33, Sec. 25.   (SB 859)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

42238.19.

For federal audit actions that became final by entry of judgment or final administrative decision on or after July 1, 1987, and that require repayment of funds to the federal government by the State Department of Education for federal audit exceptions based on findings in any school district or any other agency receiving federal funds through the department, the amount of the repayments, with interest due the federal government, may be deducted from the apportionment made to those districts or agencies by the Superintendent of Public Instruction. The amount that
 is repaid to the state under the provisions of Section 459 of the General Education Provisions Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1234h) shall be apportioned to the district in accordance with any grant back plan submitted by the district and the department and approved by the United States Department of Education.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 66, Sec. 18.   Effective June 30, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

42238.24.

Costs related to the salaries and benefits of teachers incurred by a school district or county office of education to provide the courses specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 51225.3 shall be offset by the amount of state funding apportioned to the district pursuant to this article, or in the case of a county office of education pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 2550) of Chapter 12 of Part 2 of Division 1 of Title 1, and the amount of state funding
 received from any of the items listed in Section 42605 that are contained in the annual Budget Act. The proportion of the school district’s current expense of education that is required to be expended for payment of the salaries of classroom teachers pursuant to Section 41372 shall first be allocated to fund the teacher salary costs incurred to provide the courses required by the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 724, Sec. 16.   (AB 1610)   Effective October 19, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

42242.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall determine at the time of each apportionment the proposed receipts and expenditures of funds under the provisions of the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.). In the event that the proposed distribution of funds results in funds not being expended, those funds are hereby reappropriated for reallocation for local entitlements for special education.

This section shall become operative July 1, 1984.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1296, Sec. 8.7.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

42250.1.

(a) From funds appropriated by the Legislature for this purpose for any fiscal year, the State Allocation Board shall allocate to school districts selected by the board pursuant to this section, funding for the expenses of air-conditioning equipment and insulation materials, and for the costs of installing the equipment and materials, for schools operating in the current fiscal year or planning to operate in the second subsequent fiscal year on a year-round or continuous basis pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 37400), Chapter 4
 (commencing with Section 37500), or Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 37600) of Part 22.

(b) The board shall allocate the funds appropriated under subdivision (a) only to those school districts in which a high percentage of the pupils, or a significant number of the pupils, are enrolled in the current fiscal year or will be enrolled in the second subsequent fiscal year in year round or continuous schools as described in subdivision (a). The board shall grant preference in the allocation of those funds to those year round or continuous schools that are both situated in climates that require air-conditioning and insulation during June, July, and August, and have a high percentage of overcrowding of pupils. In addition, all schools participating in the demonstration program provided pursuant to Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 37300) of Part 22 and satisfying the criteria set forth in this subdivision shall be eligible to receive, and given
 priority for, the maximum allocation of funds under this section.

(c) Whenever a school district has received an allocation pursuant to this section for a school that was scheduled to begin operating year round in the second subsequent fiscal year but that did not begin operating year round in that fiscal year, the school district shall repay the amount allocated with interest to the State School Building Fund.

(d) A school district may elect to apply for funding under this section on a basis that groups two or more qualifying schools in the district.

A school district that elects to apply for funding pursuant to this subdivision shall identify the cost for each school in that application. The total of those costs shall be the maximum amount apportioned by the state for those schools contained in that single application and that amount
 shall be no more than the amount that would have been apportioned to each school if each school had submitted an application individually. 

(e) Funds allocated to any school district under this section may be expended only to pay the actual allowable expenses of air-conditioning equipment and insulation materials, and of the installation of air-conditioning equipment and insulation materials, at the project sites that generated the funding eligibility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 553, Sec. 1.   Effective October 4, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

42251.

(a) The Superintendent shall make the following calculations for the 2011–12 fiscal year:

(1) Determine the amount of funds that will be restricted after the Superintendent makes the deduction pursuant to Section 52335.3 for each county office of education pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 2558 as of June 30, 2012.

(2) Divide fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) by the statewide sum of the amounts determined pursuant to paragraph (1). If the fraction is greater than one it shall be deemed to be one.

(3) Multiply the fraction determined pursuant to paragraph (2) by the amount determined pursuant to paragraph (1) for each county office
 of education.

(b) The auditor-controller of each county shall distribute the amounts determined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) to the Supplemental Revenue Augmentation Fund created within the county pursuant to Section 100.06 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. The aggregate amount of transfers required by this subdivision shall be made in two equal shares, with the first share being transferred no later than January 15, 2012, and the second share being transferred after that date but no later than May 1, 2012.

(c) The moneys transferred to the Supplemental Revenue Augmentation Fund in the 2011–12 fiscal year shall be transferred by the county office of education to the Controller, in amounts and for those purposes as directed by the Director of Finance, exclusively to reimburse the state for the costs of providing trial court services and costs until those moneys are
 exhausted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 162, Sec. 31.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

42252.

(a) Pursuant to Sections 21 and Section 22 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the following amounts are hereby appropriated from the Public School System Stabilization Account for the support of school districts:

(1) For the 2023-24 fiscal year, five billion two hundred eighty-four million two hundred forty-eight thousand dollars ($5,284,248,000) to the Superintendent for allocation for the local control funding formula pursuant to Sections 42238.02 and 42238.03.

(2) Thirty-three million eight hundred twenty-one thousand
 dollars ($33,821,000) for California Student Assessment System contract costs to be expended consistent with the requirements specified in Item 6100-113-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022).

(3) Twenty-one million two hundred thirty-four thousand dollars ($21,234,000) for the After School Education and Safety Program (Article 22.5 (commencing with Section 8482) of Chapter 2 of Part 6 of Division 1 of Title 1) to be expended consistent with the requirements specified in Item 6100-149-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2022.

(4) Forty-seven million nine hundred forty-one thousand dollars ($47,941,000) for Special Education Programs for Individuals with Exceptional Needs to be expended consistent with the requirements specified in Item 6100-161-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2022.

(5) Nine million seven hundred thousand dollars ($9,700,000) for the California Partnership Academies Program (Article 5 (commencing with Section 54690) of Chapter 9 of Part 29 of Division 4) to be expended consistent with the requirements specified in Item 6100-166-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2022.

(6) One million nine hundred three thousand dollars ($1,903,000) for the Agricultural Career Technical Education Incentive Grant Program (Article 7.5 (commencing with Section 52460) of Chapter 9 of Part 28 of Division 4) to be expended consistent with the requirements specified in Item 6100-167-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2022.

(7) Eleven million two hundred nineteen thousand dollars ($11,219,000) for the California Career Technical Education Incentive Grant Program (Chapter 16.5 (commencing with
 Section 53070) of Part 28 of Division 4) to be expended consistent with the requirements specified in Item 6100-168-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2022.

(8) Six million forty-six thousand dollars ($6,046,000) for the Career Technical Education Initiative to be expended consistent with the requirements specified in Item 6100-170-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2022.

(9) Six hundred thirty-four million one hundred nine thousand dollars ($634,109,000) for the California State Preschool Program to be expended consistent with the requirements specified in Item 6100-196-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2022.

(10) Two hundred three million six hundred twenty thousand dollars ($203,620,000) for Child Nutrition Programs to be expended consistent with the requirements specified in Item
 6100-203-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2022.

(11) Ninety million dollars ($90,000,000) for the Classified School Employee Summer Assistance Program pursuant to Section 45500 to be expended consistent with the requirements specified in Item 6100-220-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2022.

(12) One hundred forty-nine million forty thousand dollars ($149,040,000) for the Arts, Music, and Instructional Materials Discretionary Block Grant to be expended consistent with the requirements specified in Section 134 of Chapter 52 of the Statutes of 2022.

(13) One billion one hundred thirty-two million five hundred fifty-four thousand dollars ($1,132,554,000) for the California Community Schools Partnership Program to be expended consistent with the requirements specified in Section 8902, as amended by
 Section 9 of Chapter 52 of the Statutes of 2022.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, the following amounts from the following Controller reference items, which would otherwise be in satisfaction of subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution for the 2022–23 fiscal year, that were unallocated, unexpended, or not liquidated as of June 30, 2023, shall be deferred to the 2023–24 fiscal year: (1) 6100-113-0001$33,821,000(2) 6100-149-0001$21,234,000(3) 6100-161-0001$47,941,000(4) 6100-166-0001$9,700,000(5) 6100-167-0001$1,903,000(6) 6100-168-0001$11,219,000(7) 6100-170-0001$6,046,000(8) 6100-196-0001$634,109,000(9) 6100-203-0001$203,620,000(10) 6100-220-0001$90,000,000(11) Section 134 of Chapter 52 of the
 Statutes of 2022$149,040,000(12) Section 9 of Chapter 52 of the Statutes of 2022$1,132,554,000

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that the amounts deferred pursuant to this subdivision be supported by appropriations reflected in paragraphs (2) to (13), inclusive, of subdivision (a).

(c) The Controller shall transfer the amounts appropriated pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (4) of subdivision (a) to Section A of the State School Fund for those purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 998, Sec. 11.   (AB 176)   Effective September 30, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Funding for Small School Districts [42280. - 42289.6.]

42280.

(a) For each school district that meets, in the current or prior fiscal year, the conditions specified in Section 42282 or 42284 the Superintendent shall compute, for each qualifying school in the school district, an amount pursuant to this article.

(b) (1) The amount of funding for each qualified school district shall equal the sum of all necessary small school allowances calculated for eligible schools within the school district. Subject to paragraph (2), each necessary small school’s allowance shall be the greater of the following:

(A) The necessary small elementary school allowance determined pursuant to Section 42282 for the prior fiscal year average daily attendance and the
 number of full-time teachers, or the necessary small high school allowance determined pursuant to Section 42284 for the prior fiscal year average daily attendance and the number of certificated employees.

(B) The necessary small elementary school allowance determined pursuant to Section 42282 for the current fiscal year average daily attendance and the number of full-time teachers, or the necessary small high school allowance determined pursuant to Section 42284 for the current fiscal year average daily attendance and the number of certificated employees.

(C) The necessary small elementary school allowance determined pursuant to Section 42282 for the average of the three most recent prior fiscal years’ average daily attendance and the number of full-time teachers, or the necessary small high school allowance determined pursuant to Section 42284 for the average of the three most
 recent prior fiscal years’ average daily attendance and the number of certificated employees.

(2) (A) If the greatest necessary small school allowance calculated pursuant to paragraph (1) is equal to the amounts computed pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) and either subparagraph (A) or (C) of paragraph (1), the necessary small school allowance shall be calculated based on the amount computed pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1).
